District of Columbia statutes.
44-231

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Automated external defibrillator” or “AED” or “defibrillator” means a medical device heart monitor and defibrillator that:

(A)

Has received approval from the United States Food and Drug Administration of its premarket notification filed pursuant to section 510(k) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, approved October 10, 1962 (76 Stat. 794; 21 U.S.C. § 360(k));

(B)

Is capable of recognizing the presence or absence of ventricular fibrillation or rapid ventricular tachycardia, and determining, without intervention by an operator, whether defibrillation should be performed; and

(C)

Upon determining that defibrillation should be performed, automatically charges and requests delivery of an electrical impulse to an individual’s heart.

(2)

“Compensation” shall not include the salary of any person who registers an automated external defibrillator, trains the individuals who operate the registered automated external defibrillators, orders the automated external defibrillators which will subsequently be registered, or operates a registered automated external defibrillator at the scene of an emergency, excluding any professional medical emergency setting.

(3)

“Recreation facility” means a Department of Parks and Recreation public facility that is regularly staffed by a paid District government employee.

(4)

“Recreation facility certificate” means a certificate issued by the Mayor to authorize the installation and use of an AED at a recreation facility that has complied with the AED program requirements and guidelines established under § 44-232.01.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-278, § 2, 48 DCR 1869
Mar. 6, 2007, D.C. Law 16-217, § 2(a), 53 DCR 10207
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-362, § 2(a), 56 DCR 1211

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-217 rewrote this section, which formerly read:
“For the purposes of this chapter, the term ‘automated external defibrillator’ or ‘AED’ or ‘defibrillator’ means a medical device heart monitor and defibrillator that:
“(1) Has received approval from the United States Food and Drug Administration of its premarket notification filed pursuant to section 510(k) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, approved October 10, 1962 (76 Stat. 794; 21 U.S.C. 360(k));
“(2) Is capable of recognizing the presence or absence of ventricular fibrillation or rapid ventricular tachycardia, and determining, without intervention by an operator, whether defibrillation should be performed; and
“(3) Upon determining that defibrillation should be performed, automatically charges and requests delivery of an electrical impulse to an individual’s heart.”
D.C. Law 17-362 added pars. (3) and (4).